zh-CN: 苏格兰小风笛气囊材料: Gore-Tex（合成膜）; 混合材质（兽皮 + 合成内衬）; 皮革/兽皮; 合成材质; 其他
ja: スコティッシュスモールパイプ用バッグ素材: Gore-Tex (合成メンブレン); ハイブリッド (皮革 + 合成裏地); レザー/皮革; 合成素材; その他
it: Materiale della sacca di cornamusa scozzese: Gore-Tex (membrana sintetica); Ibrido (pelle + fodera sintetica); Cuoio/pelle; Sintetico; Altro
pl: Materiał worka dud szkockich smallpipes: Gore-Tex (membrana syntetyczna); Hybryda (skóra + podszewka syntetyczna); Skóra; Syntetyczny; Inny
ro-RO: Materialul burdufului cimpoiului scoțian mic: Gore-Tex (membrană sintetică); Hibrid (piele + căptușeală sintetică); Piele; Sintetic; Altele
el: Υλικό ασκού για σκωτσέζικες μικρές γκάιντες: Gore-Tex (συνθετική μεμβράνη); Υβριδικό (δέρμα + συνθετική επένδυση); Δέρμα; Συνθετικό; Άλλο
en: Scottish smallpipes bag material: Gore-Tex (synthetic membrane); Hybrid (hide + synthetic lining); Leather/hide; Synthetic; Other
sv: Skotskt småpipspåsematerial: Gore-Tex (syntetiskt membran); Hybrid (skinn + syntetfoder); Läder/skinn; Syntetisk; Övrigt
pt-PT: Material do saco das gaitas de foles escocesas: Gore-Tex (membrana sintética); Híbrido (pele + forro sintético); Couro/pele; Sintético; Outro
ko: 스코틀랜드 스몰파이프 백 소재: Gore-Tex(합성 멤브레인); 하이브리드(가죽 + 합성 안감); 가죽; 합성 소재; 기타
hr-HR: Materijal za škotske male lule: Gore-Tex (sintetička membrana); Hibrid (koža + sintetička podstava); Koža; Sintetika; Ostalo
sk-SK: Materiál mechu škótskych malých gájd: Gore-Tex (syntetická membrána); Hybridný materiál (koža + syntetická podšívka); Koža/useň; Syntetické; Iné
fr: Matière de la poche de la petite cornemuse écossaise: Gore-Tex (membrane synthétique); Hybride (peau + doublure synthétique); Cuir/peau; Synthétique; Autre
bg-BG: Материал на торбата за шотландски гайди: Gore-Tex (синтетична мембрана); Хибрид (кожа + синтетична подплата); Кожа/Животинска кожа; Синтетика; Други
de: Material des Scottish-Smallpipes-Sacks: Gore-Tex (synthetische Membran); Hybrid (Tierhaut + Synthetikfutter); Leder/Tierhaut; Synthetisch; Sonstige
zh-TW: 蘇格蘭室樂風笛氣袋材質: Gore-Tex (合成薄膜); 混合 (獸皮 + 合成內裡); 皮革/獸皮; 合成; 其他
cs: Materiál měchu skotských malých dud: Gore-Tex (syntetická membrána); Hybridní (kůže a syntetická podšívka); Kůže/useň; Syntetické; Jiné
nl: Schotse smallpipes zakmateriaal: Gore-Tex (synthetisch membraan); Hybride (huid + synthetische voering); Leer/huid; Synthetisch; Overig
da: Scottish smallpipes' posemateriale: Gore-Tex (syntetisk membran); Hybrid (skind og syntetisk foring); Læder/skind; Syntetisk; Andet
hu: Skót kisduda légzsákjának anyaga: Gore-Tex (szintetikus membrán); Hibrid (bőr + szintetikus bélés); Bőr; Szintetikus; Egyéb
fi: Skotlantilaisen pikkupillin materiaali: Gore-Tex (synteettinen kalvo); Hybridi (nahka ja synteettinen vuori); Nahka/vuota; Synteettinen; Muu
es: Material para bolsas de gaitas pequeñas escocesas: Gore-Tex (membrana sintética); Híbrido (piel + forro sintético); Cuero/piel; Sintético; Otro
th: วัสดุทำถุงสำหรับปี่สก็อตขนาดเล็ก: Gore-Tex (เมมเบรนสังเคราะห์); ไฮบริด (หนังสัตว์ + ซับในสังเคราะห์); หนัง/หนังสัตว์; สังเคราะห์; อื่นๆ
tr: İskoç gayda çantası malzemesi: Gore-Tex (sentetik membran); Hibrit (deri + sentetik astar); Deri/post; Sentetik; Diğer
pt-BR: Smallpipes escocesas material do saco: Gore-Tex (membrana sintética); Híbrido (couro + forro sintético); Couro/pele; Sintético; Outros
vi: Chất liệu túi kèn túi nhỏ Scotland: Gore-Tex (màng tổng hợp); Lai (da thật + lớp lót tổng hợp); Da/da thật; Tổng hợp; Khác
nb: Skotsk sekkepipe – sekkemateriale: Gore-Tex (syntetisk membran); Hybrid (skinn og syntetisk fôr); Lær/skinn; Syntetisk; Annet
lt-LT: Škotiškų smallpipes dūdmaišio maišo medžiaga: Gore-Tex (sintetinė membrana); Hibridinė (oda + sintetinis pamušalas); Oda / kailis; Sintetika; Kita
sl-SI: Material meha škotskih malih dud: Gore-Tex (sintetična membrana); Hibrid (koža + sintetična podloga); Usnje/koža; Sintetika; Drugo
ru: Материал мешка шотландских смоллпайпов: Gore-Tex (синтетическая мембрана); Гибрид (кожа + синтетическая подкладка); Кожа/шкура; Синтетика; Другое